Hawaii statutes.
§286-125 Discretionary revocation or
suspension of license by a court. In addition to the provisions for
mandatory revocation of a license set forth in section 286-124, any court of
competent jurisdiction may, in its discretion, revoke or suspend the license of
any driver convicted of any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle
is used, or convicted of a violation of this part or of any traffic law or
regulation of the State or any political subdivision thereof involving a
vehicle in motion. [L 1937, c 234, §23; RL 1945, §7324; RL 1955, §160-56; HRS
§286-125; am L 1970, c 164, §3; am L 1971, c 171, §2]

Case Notes

As §291C-161(c) requires every person convicted under
§291C-105 to be sentenced in accordance with §291C-105, trial court erred in
sentencing defendant to a six-month driver's license suspension under this
section; the plain language of §291C-105 required the sentencing court to
impose the list of sanctions as specific under §291C-105(c), including a
thirty-day license suspension for a first-time offender. 121 H. 117 (App.),
214 P.3d 1107 (2009).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next